Utah statutes.
53-7-316.   Effect of part on state and local provision.
(1)  This part supersedes all other conflicting state laws or rules concerning
LPG as regulated under this part.
(2)  A municipality or other political subdivision may not adopt or enforce
any ordinance or rule in conflict with this part, or with the rules made under
this part.
